Hawaii statutes.
§219-5 Powers; rules. (a) The
department shall have the necessary powers to carry out the purposes of this
chapter, including the following:

(1) Prescribe the qualifications for eligibility of
applicants for loans;

(2) Establish preferences and priorities in
determining eligibility for loans and loan repayment requirements;

(3) Establish the conditions, consistent with the
purpose of this chapter, for the granting or for the continuance of a grant of
a loan;

(4) Provide for inspection at reasonable hours of the
plant facilities, books, and records of an enterprise that has applied for or
has been granted a loan and require the submission of progress and final
reports;

(5) Make loans for aquacultural products development,
such as financing of plant construction, conversion, expansion, the acquisition
of land for expansion, the acquisition of equipment, machinery, supplies, or
materials or for the supplying of working capital, consistent with section
219-6;

(6) Secure loans by duly recorded first mortgages
upon the following property within the State:

(A) Fee simple farm land;

(B) Leaseholds of farm land where the lease
has an unexpired term at least two years longer than the term of the loan;

(C) Aquaculture products;

(D) Other chattels;

(E) A second mortgage when any prior mortgage
does not contain provisions that might jeopardize the security position of the
department or the borrower's ability to repay; and

(F) Written agreements, such as assignments
of income;

(7) Administer the Hawaii aquaculture loan revolving
fund and deposit into the fund all moneys received on account of principal;

(8) Include in its budget for subsequent fiscal
periods amounts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(9) Insure loans made to qualified aquaculturists by
private lenders under sections 219-7 and 219-8; provided that at no time shall
the aggregate amount of the State's liability, contingent or otherwise, on
these loans exceed $1,000,000;

(10) Participate in loans made to qualified aquaculturists
by private lenders under section 219-8;

(11) Make direct loans to qualified aquaculturists as
provided under section 219-9;

(12) Establish interest rates chargeable by the State
for direct loans and by private lenders for insured and participation loans;
and

(13) Maintain a proper reserve in the aquaculture loan
revolving fund to guarantee payment of loans insured under sections 219-7 and
219-8.

(b) The chairperson may approve loans, where
the requested amount, plus any principal balance on existing loans to the
applicant, does not exceed $25,000 of state funds.

(c) The department shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to effectuate this section. [L 1971, c 181, pt of §1; am L 1977,
c 212, pt of §2; am L 1978, c 88, §2; am L 1979, c 137, §2; am L 1995, c 76,
§2; am L 1997, c 159, §2; am L 2002, c 16, §8(1)]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next